New York, session 2025-2026, A4553.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision f of section 3-115 of the administrative code 2 of the city of New York is amended by adding a new paragraph 4 to read 3 as follows: 4 (4) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a valid New 5 York city identity card shall be accepted as valid written evidence of 6 age or identification in any situation where an individual is required 7 to furnish written evidence of age or identification. 8 § 2. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 390-f 9 to read as follows: 10 § 390-f. Acceptance of New York city identity cards. Notwithstanding 11 any provision of law to the contrary, a valid New York city identity 12 card issued pursuant to section 3-115 of the administrative code of the 13 city of New York shall be accepted as valid written evidence of age or 14 identification in any situation where an individual is required to 15 furnish written evidence of age or identification. 16 § 3. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 2 of section 65-b of the alcoholic 17 beverage control law, as amended by chapter 519 of the laws of 1999, is 18 amended to read as follows: 19 (b) No licensee, or agent or employee of such licensee shall accept as 20 written evidence of age by any such person for the purchase of any alco- 21 holic beverage, any documentation other than: (i) a valid driver's 22 license or non-driver identification card issued by the commissioner of 23 motor vehicles, the federal government, any United States territory, EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08696-01-5 A. 4553 2 1 commonwealth or possession, the District of Columbia, a state government 2 within the United States or a provincial government of the dominion of 3 Canada, or (ii) a valid passport issued by the United States government 4 or any other country, or (iii) an identification card issued by the 5 armed forces of the United States, or (iv) a valid New York city identi- 6 ty card issued pursuant to section 3-115 of the administrative code of 7 the city of New York. Upon the presentation of such driver's license or 8 non-driver identification card issued by a governmental entity, such 9 licensee or agent or employee thereof may perform a transaction scan as 10 a precondition to the sale of any alcoholic beverage. Nothing in this 11 section shall prohibit a licensee or agent or employee from performing 12 such a transaction scan on any of the other documents listed in this 13 subdivision if such documents include a bar code or magnetic strip that 14 [that] may be scanned by a device capable of deciphering any electron- 15 ically readable format. 16 § 4. Subdivision 3 of section 1399-cc of the public health law, as 17 amended by chapter 100 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 3. Sale of tobacco products, herbal cigarettes, liquid nicotine, 20 shisha or electronic cigarettes in such places, other than by a vending 21 machine, shall be made only to an individual who demonstrates, through 22 (a) a valid driver's license or non-driver's identification card issued 23 by the commissioner of motor vehicles, the federal government, any 24 United States territory, commonwealth or possession, the District of 25 Columbia, a state government within the United States or a provincial 26 government of the dominion of Canada, or (b) a valid passport issued by 27 the United States government or any other country, or (c) an identifica- 28 tion card issued by the armed forces of the United States, or (d) a 29 valid New York city identity card issued pursuant to section 3-115 of 30 the administrative code of the city of New York, indicating that the 31 individual is at least twenty-one years of age. Such identification need 32 not be required of any individual who reasonably appears to be at least 33 twenty-five years of age, provided, however, that such appearance shall 34 not constitute a defense in any proceeding alleging the sale of a tobac- 35 co product, herbal cigarettes, liquid nicotine, shisha or electronic 36 cigarettes to an individual under twenty-one years of age. 37 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately.